tests/барокко.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах барокко":
    барокко<n><nom> :  барокко 
    барокко<n><gen> :  бароккӑн 
    барокко<n><dat> :  бароккӑна 
    барокко<n><loc> :  бароккӑра 
    барокко<n><abl> :  бароккӑран 
    барокко<n><ins> :  бароккӑпа 
    барокко<n><abe> :  бароккӑсӑр 
    барокко<n><ben> :  бароккӑшӑн
    барокко<n><px1sg><nom> :  бароккӑм 
    барокко<n><px1sg><gen> :  бароккӑмӑн 
    барокко<n><px1sg><dat> :  бароккӑма 
    барокко<n><px1sg><loc> :  бароккӑмра 
    барокко<n><px1sg><abl> :  бароккӑмран 
    барокко<n><px1sg><ins> :  бароккӑмпа 
    барокко<n><px1sg><abe> :  бароккӑмсӑр 
    барокко<n><px1sg><ben> :  бароккӑмшӑн
    барокко<n><px2sg><nom> :  барокку 
    барокко<n><px2sg><gen> :  бароккун 
    барокко<n><px2sg><dat> :  бароккуна 
    барокко<n><px2sg><loc> :  бароккунта 
    барокко<n><px2sg><abl> :  бароккунтан 
    барокко<n><px2sg><ins> :  бароккупа 
    барокко<n><px2sg><abe> :  бароккусӑр 
    барокко<n><px2sg><ben> :  бароккушӑн
    барокко<n><px3sp><nom> :  барокки 
    барокко<n><px3sp><gen> :  бароккин 
    барокко<n><px3sp><dat> :  бароккине 
    барокко<n><px3sp><loc> :  бароккинче 
    барокко<n><px3sp><abl> :  бароккинчен 
    барокко<n><px3sp><ins> :  бароккипе 
    барокко<n><px3sp><abe> :  бароккисӗр 
    барокко<n><px3sp><ben> :  бароккишӗн
    барокко<n><px1pl><nom> :  бароккӑмӑр 
    барокко<n><px1pl><gen> :  бароккӑмӑрӑн 
    барокко<n><px1pl><dat> :  бароккӑмӑра 
    барокко<n><px1pl><loc> :  бароккӑмӑрта 
    барокко<n><px1pl><abl> :  бароккӑмӑртан 
    барокко<n><px1pl><ins> :  бароккӑмӑрпа 
    барокко<n><px1pl><abe> :  бароккӑмӑрсӑр 
    барокко<n><px1pl><ben> :  бароккӑмӑршӑн
    барокко<n><px2pl><nom> :  бароккӑр 
    барокко<n><px2pl><gen> :  бароккӑрӑн 
    барокко<n><px2pl><dat> :  бароккӑра 
    барокко<n><px2pl><loc> :  бароккӑрта 
    барокко<n><px2pl><abl> :  бароккӑртан 
    барокко<n><px2pl><ins> :  бароккӑрпа 
    барокко<n><px2pl><abe> :  бароккӑрсӑр 
    барокко<n><px2pl><ben> :  бароккӑршӑн
    барокко<n><pl><nom> :  бароккӑсем 
    барокко<n><pl><gen> :  бароккӑсен 
    барокко<n><pl><dat> :  бароккӑсене 
    барокко<n><pl><loc> :  бароккӑсенче 
    барокко<n><pl><abl> :  бароккӑсенчен 
    барокко<n><pl><ins> :  бароккӑсемпе 
    барокко<n><pl><abe> :  бароккӑсемсӗр 
    барокко<n><pl><ben> :  бароккӑсемшӗн
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  бароккӑмсем 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  бароккӑмсен 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  бароккӑмсене 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  бароккӑмсенче 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  бароккӑмсенчен 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  бароккӑмсемпе 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  бароккӑмсемсӗр 
    барокко<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  бароккӑмсемшӗн
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  бароккусем 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  бароккусен 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  бароккусене 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  бароккусенче 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  бароккусенчен 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  бароккусемпе 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  бароккусемсӗр 
    барокко<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  бароккусемшӗн
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  бароккисем 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  бароккисен 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  бароккисене 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  бароккисенче 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  бароккисенчен 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  бароккисемпе 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  бароккисемсӗр 
    барокко<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  бароккисемшӗн
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  бароккӑмӑрсем 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  бароккӑмӑрсен 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  бароккӑмӑрсене 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  бароккӑмӑрсенче 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  дмӑрсенчен 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  бароккӑмӑрсемпе 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  бароккӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    барокко<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  бароккӑмӑрсемшӗн
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  бароккӑрсем 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  бароккӑрсен 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  бароккӑрсене 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  бароккӑрсенче 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  бароккӑрсенчен 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  бароккӑрсемпе 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  бароккӑрсемсӗр 
    барокко<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  бароккӑрсемшӗн
